Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.356

Activities not constituting transacting business.

A nonexhaustive list of activities that do not constitute transacting business in this state is provided in RCW 23.95.520.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7124; 2015 c 188 s 70.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.